Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0772.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3476. (1) An insurer that delivers, issues for delivery, or renews in this state a health insurance policy shall not require face-to-face contact between a health care professional and a patient for services appropriately provided through telemedicine, as determined by the insurer. An insurer described in this subsection shall not require a health care professional to provide services for a patient through telemedicine unless the services are contractually required per the terms of a contract between the insurer and an affiliated provider or a third-party vendor for telemedicine first or telemedicine-only products, and clinically appropriate as determined by the health care professional. Telemedicine services must be provided by a health care professional who is licensed, registered, or otherwise authorized to engage in the health care professional's health care profession in the state where the patient is located. Telemedicine services are subject to all terms and conditions of the health insurance policy agreed on between the policy holder and the insurer, including, but not limited to, required copayments, coinsurances, deductibles, and approved amounts. If a service is provided through telemedicine under this section, the insurer shall provide at least the same coverage at the same rate for that service as if the service involved face-to-face contact between the health care professional and the patient and must use evaluation and management codes applicable to face-to-face contact for purposes of coverage and reimbursement rates. (2) As used in this section: (a) After December 31, 2017, "insurer" includes a nonprofit dental care corporation operating under 1963 PA 125, MCL 550.351 to 550.373. (b) "Telemedicine" means the use of an electronic media to link patients with health care professionals in different locations. To be considered telemedicine under this section, the health care professional must be able to examine the patient via a health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, compliant, secure interactive audio or video, or both, telecommunications system, or through the use of store and forward online messaging.